Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7093.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
(1) Anti-Semitism and harassment on the basis of actual or perceived national origin,
shared ancestry, or ethnic characteristics with a religious group remains a persistent, pervasive, and
disturbing problem in contemporary American society.
(2) The Jewish people continue to be a targeted minority in the United States. Data shows
that Jews are among the most likely of all religious groups to be victimized by incidents of hate,
and such incidents are increasing at an alarming rate.
(3) State officials and institutions, including educational institutions, have a responsibility
to protect citizens from acts of hate and bigotry motivated by a discriminatory animus, including
anti-Semitism, and must be given the tools to do so.
(4) Valid monitoring, informed analysis and investigation, and effective policy making all
require uniform definitions.
(5) While there is no exhaustive definition of anti-Semitism, as it can take many forms, the
International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance's (IHRA) working definition has been an essential
tool used to determine contemporary manifestations of anti-Semitism and includes useful examples
of discriminatory anti-Israel acts that cross the line into anti-Semitism.
(6) On May 26, 2016, the member states of the IHRA, including the United States, adopted
the non-legally binding working definition of anti-Semitism at its plenary session in Bucharest.

This definition is used by various agencies of the federal government and the other thirty-three (33)
governments that are members of the IHRA. The definition has been recommended for use by the
European Council and the Secretary General of the Organization of American States, included in
policy guides prepared by the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe, and formally
adopted by a growing number of European nations.
(7) Awareness of this conduct-based definition of anti-Semitism, although it is not to be
taken as an exclusive definition, will increase understanding of the parameters of contemporary
anti-Jewish crime and discrimination in certain circumscribed areas.
SECTION 2. Section 42-112-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-112 entitled "The Civil
Rights Act of 1990" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-112-1. Discrimination prohibited.
(a) All persons within the state, regardless of race, color, religion, sex, disability, age, or
country of ancestral origin, have, except as is otherwise provided or permitted by law, the same
rights to make and enforce contracts, to inherit, purchase, to lease, sell, hold, and convey real and
personal property, to sue, be parties, give evidence, and to the full and equal benefit of all laws and
proceedings for the security of persons and property, and are subject to like punishment, pains,
penalties, taxes, licenses, and exactions of every kind, and to no other.
(b) For the purposes of this section, the right to “make and enforce contracts, to inherit,
purchase, to lease, sell, hold, and convey real and personal property” includes the making,
performance, modification and termination of contracts and rights concerning real or personal
property, and the enjoyment of all benefits, terms, and conditions of the contractual and other
relationships.
(c) Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to affect chapter 14.1 of title 37,
chapter 5.1 of title 28, or any other remedial programs designed to address past societal
discrimination.
(d) For the purposes of this section, the terms “sex” and “age” have the same meaning as
those terms are defined in § 28-5-6, the state fair employment practices act. The term “disability”
has the same meaning as that term is defined in § 42-87-1, and the terms, as used regarding persons
with disabilities, “auxiliary aids and services,” “readily achievable,” “reasonable accommodation,”
“reasonable modification,” and “undue hardship” shall have the same meaning as those terms are
defined in § 42-87-1.1.
(e) For the purposes of this section, the term:
(1) “Protective hairstyles” means and includes, but is not limited to, hair texture or
hairstyles, if that hair texture or that hairstyle is commonly associated with a particular race or
LC003936 - Page 2 of 4

national origin (including a hairstyle in which hair is tightly coiled or tightly curled, locks,
cornrows, twists, braids, Bantu knots, and Afros).
(2) “Race” means and includes traits historically associated with race, including, but not
limited to, hair texture and protective hairstyles.
(f) For purposes of this section, the term “anti-Semitism” means:
(1) The definition of anti-Semitism adopted on May 26, 2016, by the International
Holocaust Remembrance Alliance, which has been adopted by the United States Department of
State;
(2) Contemporary examples of anti-Semitism identified by the International Holocaust
Remembrance Alliance; and
(3) Does not include criticism of Israel similar to that leveled against any other country.
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Diminish or infringe upon any rights protected under the First Amendment to the United
States Constitution or Article I of the Rhode Island State Constitution; or
(2) Conflict with federal or state discrimination laws.
(h) In reviewing, investigating, or deciding whether there has been a specific instance of
discrimination that violates a state law prohibiting discrimination or is otherwise subject to the
authority of the commission, the state, any of its agencies, or local subdivisions of state agencies,
shall take into consideration the definition of anti-Semitism for purposes of determining whether
the instance of discrimination was motivated by anti-Semitic intent.
(i) A discriminatory act includes any harassing conduct that is so severe, pervasive, or
persistent as to interfere with or limit the ability of the victim to participate in or benefit from any
service, activity, opportunity, or privilege.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003936
========
LC003936 - Page 3 of 4